Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.7 Healthcare Assistance for Working People with Disabilities

40-8.7-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as “The Sherlock Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1.

40-8.7-2.
Medicaid buy-in program.

The department of human services is hereby authorized to establish a Medicaid buy-in program pursuant to the “Balanced Budget Act of 1997,” 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(a)(10)(A)(ii)(XIII).

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1.

40-8.7-3.
Purpose.

The purpose of the Medicaid buy-in program is to:

Enable individuals with disabilities to enter and reenter the work force as soon as possible;

Provide health care and employment support services to individuals with disabilities that will enable those individuals to reduce their dependency on cash benefit programs; and

Allow individuals with disabilities the option to purchase Medicaid coverage that is necessary to enable such individuals to obtain and/or maintain employment.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.

40-8.7-4.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Employed” means the individual with disabilities is engaged in a work effort that meets substantial and reasonable threshold criteria for hours of work, wages, or other measures, as defined by the department of human services and as permitted by federal law.

“Employment support services” means activities needed to sustain paid work including: benefits counseling; supervision; job coaching; vocational evaluation; case management; job development; customized employment; job training; transportation; training; tools; equipment; and technology, subject to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approval.

“Individual with a disability” means a person who has been designated, but without regard to his or her ability to engage in substantial gainful activity, as specified in the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 423(d)(4), as a totally and permanently disabled individual by the Social Security Administration or the Rhode Island Medicaid program, pursuant to an application for benefits under Title II, Title XVI, or Title XIX of the Social Security Act, regardless of current receipt of cash benefits under the Social Security Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.

40-8.7-5.
Authorization for Medicaid buy-in program and personal care services.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its Title XIX state plan to initiate a Medicaid buy-in program for employed individuals with disabilities.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its Title XIX state plan to initiate community choice first for personal care services, including through a home health agency and/or self-directed plan.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to review and/or amend its Title XIX state plan to initiate the full scope of services authorized under § 1915(i) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. § 1396n], for Medicaid buy-in participants who are eligible upon clinical assessment, subject to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approval.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.

40-8.7-6.
Eligibility.

To be eligible for benefits under the Medicaid buy-in program:

The person shall be an individual with disabilities as defined in §

40-8.7-4

, but without regard to his or her ability to engage in substantial gainful activity, as specified in the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 423(d)(4);

The person shall be employed as defined in §

40-8.7-4

;

The person’s net accountable income shall not exceed two hundred fifty percent (250%) of the federal poverty level, taking into account the SSI program disregards and impairment-related work expenses as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396a(r)(2);

A maximum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) of available resources for an individual and twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) for a couple shall be disregarded as shall any additional resources held in a retirement account, in a medical savings account, or any other account, related to enhancing the independence of the individual and approved under rules to be adopted by the department; and

The person shall be a current medical assistance recipient under §

40-8.5-1

[CNIL] or §

40-8-3(5)(v)

[MNIL]; or shall meet income, assets, (except as modified by subsection (a)(4) of this section) and eligibility requirements for the medical assistance program under §

40-8.5-1

[CNIL] or §

40-8-3(5)(v)

[MNIL], as such requirements are modified and extended by this chapter.

Appeals Process. The director or designee shall review each application filed in accordance with regulations, and shall make a determination of whether the application will be approved and the extent of the benefits to be made available to the applicant, and shall, within thirty (30) days after the filing, notify the applicant, in writing, of the determination. If the application is rejected, the applicant shall be notified the reason for the denial. The director may at any time reconsider any determination. Any applicant for or recipient of benefits aggrieved because of a decision, or delay in making a decision, shall be entitled to an appeal and shall be afforded reasonable notice and opportunity for a fair hearing conducted by the director, pursuant to chapter 8 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.

40-8.7-7.
Premiums.

The department of human services is authorized and directed to promulgate such rules to establish the monthly premium payments for employed individuals with disabilities who opt to participate directly in the Medicaid buy-in program. To participate in the Medicaid buy-in program, the employed individual with disabilities shall be required to make payment for coverage in accordance with a monthly payment or payment formula to be established by the department that shall count a portion of the individual’s or couple’s earned income on a sliding-scale basis, in accordance with rules to be established by the department.

The department is further authorized and directed to promulgate such rules to encourage businesses to hire individuals with disabilities, and to allow employed individuals with disabilities who have access to employer-based health insurance and who are determined eligible by the department pursuant to this chapter to coordinate health insurance coverage options.

The department of human services, in consultation with the health insurance commissioner, employer and disability advocacy organizations, shall, by June 30, 2012, investigate, develop, and promulgate rules that may:

Require enrollment in the employer-based health insurance plan as a condition of participation in the Medicaid buy-in program under this chapter, provided that enrollment in the employer-based health insurance plan is cost-effective and its benefits are comparable to the benefits provided by the Medicaid program. Enrollment of the individual and/or the family in the employer-based health insurance plan without regard to any enrollment season restrictions, subject to Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services approval; or

Provide opportunities for employers to buy into the Medicaid Buy-in program, at the employer’s expense, where the employer’s premium contribution shall be no greater than the employer’s premiums in the existing employer-based health insurance or before September 30, 2012.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 351, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 394, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.

40-8.7-8.
Work-related protections.

Medicaid buy-in participants shall continue on the Medicaid buy-in program for up to four (4) months after loss of employment due to a medical condition. If the loss of employment is not due to a medical condition, the individual may continue to be eligible for up to four (4) months, but must pay a monthly premium equal to their monthly-unearned income in excess of the medically needy income limit.

Medicaid buy-in participants who return to other Medicaid eligibility categories shall have their accrued savings in a retirement account and/or a medical savings account excluded from countable assets.

The department shall promulgate rules or regulations necessary to institute the work-related protections of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1.

40-8.7-9.
Regulations and commencement of program.

The department of human services shall promulgate the rules or regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act by September 30, 2011, and enrollment of individuals with disabilities in the Medicaid buy-in program shall commence under the new rules on or before January 1, 2012.

The department of human services shall provide quarterly progress reports to the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees by the fifteenth (15th) day of the following month of each quarter, from date of passage until March 2013.

By March 31, 2013, the department shall report annually to the governor and the chairpersons of the house and senate finance committees on data included, but not limited to, the following:

The number of applications, the number of approved applications, the number of applicants who are currently eligible for other forms of medical coverage;

Demographics including: age, sex, employment supports provided; and primary disabling condition, as permissible under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) privacy and security rules;

Prior and current participation in other public assistance programs including Medicare, Social Security Disability Insurance (SSDI), Supplemental Security Income (SSI), including the 1619(b) provision;

The number of beneficiaries employed, and the average wage of those beneficiaries prior to and post Medicaid buy-in plan eligibility;

The amounts of premiums collected;

Medicaid claims data including pre-buy-in, while on the buy-in, and if disenrolled, after buy-in to perform an analysis of costs/per member, per month, of buy-in enrollees shall also be provided by the Medicaid agency to the Medicaid Infrastructure Grant recipient, as provided for in the data use agreement;

Findings and recommendations with regard to “best practices” used by other states in the New England region and nationwide that should be considered to increase employment among Medicaid beneficiaries with disabilities and how to best support Medicaid beneficiaries with disabilities who are working; and

Identification and strategies that the finance committees should consider regarding challenges or opportunities for workers with disabilities in Rhode Island as the Affordable Care Act is implemented; including, but not limited to, ensuring that employment supportive policies and supports are integrated into the state’s design and implementation of the following long-term care Affordable Care Act provisions: Section 10202—Balancing Incentive Payments Plan (BIPP); 1915(i) State Plan Amendment; Section 2401—Community First Choice (CFC); Section 2703—Health Homes for Individuals with chronic conditions; Money Follows the Person; 2014 Medicaid Expansion; and the dual eligible integrated care plan models.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 354, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 241, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 253, § 1.